Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB633.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 8158 of Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 8158. Injured police animals.* * *(b.1) Communication centers.--Each communications center dispatching EMS resources shall compile and maintain accurate information regarding police animal care capabilities and any other information deemed necessary by the communications center dispatching EMS resources for the following to assist in the timely transport and care of an injured police animal:(1) V eterinary clinics. (2) Hospital emergency departments.1234567891011121314151617 (3) Similar facilities.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0633PN0637 - 2 - 123